Oklahoma, session 2026, SB825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 292 of Title 68, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Upon the effective date of this act, the Oklahoma Tax


Commission shall operate in a manner that focuses on assisting the


taxpayers of this state with compliance with the tax laws of this


state, rather than a focus on increasing fees, fines, and penalties.


B. Upon the effective date of this act, any fees, fines,


penalties, and interest charged or levied by the Tax Commission

Req. No. 1554 Page 1


against a taxpayer for noncompliance with tax laws and rules of this


state shall be reduced by twenty percent (20%).


C. If the Tax Commission incorrectly charges or levies any


fees, fines, penalties, and interest either by the wrong amount or


by incorrectly determining a taxpayer is noncompliant, the amount


shall be returned to the taxpayer plus double any amount of interest


that the Commission would have charged the taxpayer for


noncompliance with any provision under which the taxpayer was


charged.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.




60-1-1554 QD 1/19/2025 5:44:10 AM

























Req. No. 1554 Page 2